src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_23_hoppee_gt-norm-dial_Jok.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - hopea - ok : # Noun 'borg' -
     hoppee+N+Sg+Nom: hopea
     hoppee+N+Sg+Gen: hopean
     hoppee+N+Sg+Par: [hopeata, hopeaa]
     hoppee+N+Sg+Tra: hopeaksi
     hoppee+N+Sg+Abe: hopeatta
     hoppee+N+Sg+Ine: hopeassa
     hoppee+N+Sg+Ela: hopeasta
     hoppee+N+Sg+Ill: hopehaan
     hoppee+N+Sg+Ade: hopealla
     hoppee+N+Sg+Abl: hopealta
     hoppee+N+Sg+All: [hopealle, hopeallet] 
     hoppee+N+Sg+Ess: hopeanna
     hoppee+N+Pl+Nom: hopeat
     hoppee+N+Pl+Gen: hopeitten
     hoppee+N+Pl+Par: hopeita
     hoppee+N+Pl+Tra: hopeiksi
     hoppee+N+Pl+Abe: hopeitta
     hoppee+N+Pl+Ine: hopeissa
     hoppee+N+Pl+Ela: hopeista
     hoppee+N+Pl+Ill: hopeissiin
     hoppee+N+Pl+Ade: hopeila
     hoppee+N+Pl+Abl: hopeilta
     hoppee+N+Pl+All: [hopeile, hopeilet]
     hoppee+N+Pl+Ess: hopeina
     hoppee+N+Pl+Com: hopeine
